Hawaii statutes.
[§323D-12.6] State health planning and
development special fund; created; deposits; expenditures; fees. (a)
There is established within the state treasury, to be administered by the state
health planning and development agency, the state health planning and
development special fund into which shall be deposited all moneys collected
under chapter 323D.

(b) Moneys in the special fund shall be
expended by the state health planning and development agency to assist in
offsetting program expenses of the agency.

(c) The agency shall adopt rules in accordance
with chapter 91 to establish reasonable fees for the purposes of this chapter.
[L 1999, c 120, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next